test/src/morphology/A-onneton_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ihminen - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'menneske' - ei tsekattu
     onneton+A+Sg+Nom: onneton
     onneton+A+Sg+Gen: onnettoman
     onneton+A+Sg+Par: onnetonta
     onneton+A+Sg+Tra: onnettomaksi
     onneton+A+Sg+Abe: onnettomatta
     onneton+A+Sg+Ine: onnettomassa
     onneton+A+Sg+Ela: onnettomasta
     onneton+A+Sg+Ill: onnettomhaan
     onneton+A+Sg+Ade: onnettomala
     onneton+A+Sg+Abl: onnettomalta
     onneton+A+Sg+All: onnettomale
     onneton+A+Sg+Ess: onnettomana
     onneton+A+Pl+Nom: onnettomat
     onneton+A+Pl+Gen: onnettommiin
     onneton+A+Pl+Par: onnettommiita
     onneton+A+Pl+Tra: onnettomiksi
     onneton+A+Pl+Abe: onnettomitta
     onneton+A+Pl+Ine: onnettomissa
     onneton+A+Pl+Ela: onnettomista
     onneton+A+Pl+Ill: onnettommhiin
     onneton+A+Pl+Ade: onnettomila
     onneton+A+Pl+Abl: onnettomilta
     onneton+A+Pl+All: onnettomile
     onneton+A+Pl+Ess: onnettomina
     onneton+A+Pl+Com: onnettomine
